Nebraska, session 109, LB908.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB908 LB908
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-2923, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-2923 The best interests of the child require:
(1) A parenting arrangement and parenting plan or other court-
ordered arrangement which provides for a child's safety, emotional
growth, health, stability, and physical care and regular and continuous
school attendance and progress for school-age children;
(2) When a preponderance of the evidence indicates domestic intimate
partner abuse, a parenting and visitation arrangement that provides for
the safety of a victim parent;
(3) That the child's families and those serving in parenting roles
remain appropriately active and involved in parenting with safe,
appropriate, continuing quality contact between children and their
families when they have shown the ability to act in the best interests of
the child and have shared in the responsibilities of raising the child;
(4) That even when parents have voluntarily negotiated or mutually
mediated and agreed upon a parenting plan, the court shall determine
whether it is in the best interests of the child for parents to maintain
continued communications with each other and to make joint decisions in
performing parenting functions as are necessary for the care and healthy
development of the child. If the court rejects a parenting plan, the
court shall provide written findings as to why the parenting plan is not
in the best interests of the child;
(5) That certain principles provide a basis upon which education of
parents is delivered and upon which negotiation and mediation of
parenting plans are conducted. Such principles shall include: To minimize
the potentially negative impact of parental conflict on children; to
provide parents the tools they need to reach parenting decisions that are
in the best interests of a child; to provide alternative dispute
resolution or specialized alternative dispute resolution options that are
less adversarial for the child and the family; to ensure that the child's
-2-

LB908 LB908
2026 2026
voice is heard and considered in parenting decisions; to maximize the
safety of family members through the justice process; and, in cases of
domestic intimate partner abuse or child abuse or neglect, to incorporate
the principles of victim safety and sensitivity, offender accountability,
and community safety in parenting plan decisions; and
(6) In determining custody and parenting arrangements, the court
shall consider the best interests of the minor child, which shall
include, but not be limited to, consideration of the foregoing factors
and:
(a) The relationship of the minor child to each parent prior to the
commencement of the action or any subsequent hearing;
(b) The desires and wishes of the minor child, if of an age of
comprehension but regardless of chronological age, when such desires and
wishes are based on sound reasoning;
(c) The general health, welfare, and social behavior of the minor
child;
(d) Credible research showing increased intellectual and social
growth in children who have equal access to both parents;
(e) (d) Credible evidence of abuse inflicted on any family or
household member. For purposes of this subdivision, abuse and family or
household member shall have the meanings prescribed in section 42-903;
and
(f) (e) Credible evidence of child abuse or neglect or domestic
intimate partner abuse. For purposes of this subdivision, the definitions
in section 43-2922 shall be used.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-2923, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-